apertium-eng.eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 66156
	Sdefs: 86
	Paradigms: 392
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools sort -alignMonodix apertium-eng.eng.dix apertium-eng.eng.dix

-->
<!--
This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
(at your option) any later version.

This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
GNU General Public License for more details.

You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
-->

<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper name"/>
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="Verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo" 	c="Verb 'to do'"/>
    <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet" 	c="Predeterminer"/>
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="attr" 	c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mfn" 	c="Masculine / feminine / neuter"/>
    <sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="al" 	c="Altres (other)"/>
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="Anthroponym (first name)"/>
    <sdef n="cog" 	c="Cognomen (family name)"/>
    <sdef n="prs" 	c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="Present (tense)"/>
    <sdef n="past" 	c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="pii" 	c="Past indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pis" 	c="Past subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="subs" 	c="Verbal noun"/>
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="ger" 	c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="End of sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="quot" 	c="Quote mark"/>
    <sdef n="lquot" 	c="Quote mark left"/>
    <sdef n="rquot" 	c="Quote mark right"/>
    <sdef n="abbr" 	c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="pred" 	c="Predicative"/>
    <sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral / Number"/>
    <sdef n="pron" 	c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="percent" 	c="Percentage"/>
    <sdef n="guio" 	c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="sep" 	c="Seperable verb"/>
    <sdef n="sint" 	c="Synthetic adjective"/>
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="org" 	c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="tn" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="nn" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="aa" 	c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="an" 	c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="lquest" 	c="left question mark"/>
    <sdef n="obj" 	c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj" 	c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="pers" 	c="Personal (pronoun)"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="guionet">
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <p><l>,</l>         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lainausmerkit">
  <e>       <p><l>&quot;</l>    <r>&quot;<s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>&quot;</l>    <r>&quot;<s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>”</l>         <r>&quot;<s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>“</l>         <r>&quot;<s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>»</l>         <r>&quot;<s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>«</l>         <r>&quot;<s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aposchar">
  <e>       <i>'</i></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>’</l>         <r>'</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <par n="aposchar"/><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re><p><l>°C</l><r>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([0-9]+)?</re><p><l>°C</l><r>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>o'clock</l><r><b/>o'clock<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals">
  <e>       <re>([0-9]*[02-9]1|1)</re><p><l>st</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>([0-9]*[02-9]2|2)</re><p><l>nd</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>([0-9]*[02-9]3|3)</re><p><l>rd</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>1[0-9]</re><p><l>th</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]*([4-90]|1[0-9])</re><p><l>th</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <!-- Unsupported -->
  <e r="RL"><re>([0-9]*[02-9]1|1)</re><p><l>st</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><re>([0-9]*[02-9]2|2)</re><p><l>nd</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><re>([0-9]*[02-9]3|3)</re><p><l>rd</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><re>1[0-9]</re><p><l>th</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><re>[0-9]*([4-90]|1[0-9])</re><p><l>th</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals-century-units">
  <e>       <i>1st</i></e>
  <e>       <i>2nd</i></e>
  <e>       <i>3rd</i></e>
  <e>       <i>4th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>5th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>6th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>7th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>8th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>9th</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals-century-units(1)">
  <e>       <i>0th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>1th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>2th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>3th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>4th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>5th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>6th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>7th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>8th</i></e>
  <e>       <i>9th</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals-century-zero">
  <e>       <i>0th</i></e>
  <e>       <i></i><par n="ordinals-century-units"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals-century">
  <e>       <i></i><par n="ordinals-century-units"/></e>
  <e>       <i>1</i><par n="ordinals-century-units(1)"/></e>
  <e>       <i>2</i><par n="ordinals-century-zero"/></e>
  <e>       <i>3</i><par n="ordinals-century-zero"/></e>
  <e>       <i>4</i><par n="ordinals-century-zero"/></e>
  <e>       <i>5</i><par n="ordinals-century-zero"/></e>
  <e>       <i>6</i><par n="ordinals-century-zero"/></e>
  <e>       <i>7</i><par n="ordinals-century-zero"/></e>
  <e>       <i>8</i><par n="ordinals-century-zero"/></e>
  <e>       <i>9</i><par n="ordinals-century-zero"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="(x)th-(y)th centuries (AD|BC)"><par n="ordinals-century"/><i>-</i><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>centuries</i><par n="BC"/><i></i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="(x)th and (y)th centuries (AD|BC)"><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>and<b/></i><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>centuries</i><par n="BC"/><i></i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="(x)th century (AD|BC)"><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>century</i><par n="BC"/><i></i><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="lainausmerkit"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ordinals"/></e>
